North Carolina, session 2025, HB177.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 2 of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 126-8.7. Reducing barriers to State employment.
(a) The State Human Resources Commission (SHRC) shall do all of the following:
(1) Regularly assess the educational, experiential, and training requirements
necessary for each position within each State agency, department, and
institution.
(2) Determine when practical experience and training, such as military service, an
apprenticeship, or a trade school education, rather than a four-year college
degree, is the appropriate qualification for a position.
(3) Identify jobs for which the educational, experiential, and training
requirements could be reduced from their present level.
(4) Remove language for a four-year college degree in position descriptions, to
the extent practicable, when they are not necessary for the position.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2025, and then annually thereafter, the SHRC shall report to
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government on its efforts to reduce
barriers to State employment as required by this section."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H177-v-1*